Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-1241
State investment officer; deputy; duties; bond or insurance.

The state investment officer shall devote his or her entire time and attention to the duties of his or her office. The state investment officer shall not engage in any other occupation or profession or hold any other public office, appointive or elective. If for any reason the state investment officer is unable to perform the duties of his or her office, or the office is vacant due to death, resignation, or otherwise, the council shall designate an acting state investment officer to serve until the state investment officer is able to act or the vacancy is filled. With the approval of the council, the state investment officer may designate a deputy to perform such acts and duties as the state investment officer shall authorize, subject to the same restrictions as apply to the state investment officer. The deputy shall be bonded or insured as required by section 11-201. The state investment officer shall be responsible for all official acts of the deputy.

Laws 1969, c. 584, § 5, p. 2351;

Laws 1971, LB 53, § 6;

Laws 1978, LB 653, § 28;

Laws 2004, LB 884, § 35.